Hawaii statutes.
§40-53 Salary and pension payments. (a)
All payments for permanent settlements, specific and all other salaries, shall
be drawn by the comptroller, payable to each individual to whom the State is
directly indebted, except as provided for in section 40-58. No permanent
settlements nor salary checks shall be paid by the director of finance until
the person in whose favor the check is drawn shall have indorsed the person's
signature thereon.

(b) All employees hired on or after July 1,
1998, shall designate a financial institution account into which the State is
authorized to deposit the employee's pay. The comptroller may waive the
requirements of this section for any state employee upon request by the head of
the employing department under policies prescribed by the comptroller. The
implementation of this section shall not be subject to negotiation under
chapter 89. [L 1898, c 39, §11C; RL 1925, §1450; RL 1935, §577; RL 1945, §1581;
RL 1955, §34-30; am L 1957, c 152, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c
114, §1; HRS §40-53; gen ch 1985; am L 1998, c 110, §2; am L 2007, c 28, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next